Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1423
Commission;
powers; duties.

The commission shall have authority
to:

(1) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its organization
and internal management and rules and regulations governing the exercise of
its powers and the fulfillment of its purposes under sections 81-1415 to 81-1426;

(2) Delegate to one or more of its members such powers and
duties as it may deem proper;

(3) Coordinate and jointly pursue its activities with the
Governor's Policy Research Office;

(4) Appoint and abolish such advisory committees as may be
necessary for the performance of its functions and delegate appropriate powers
and duties to them;

(5) Plan improvements in the administration of criminal justice
and promote their implementation;

(6) Make or encourage studies of any aspect of the administration
of criminal justice;

(7) Conduct research and stimulate research by public and
private agencies which shall be designed to improve the administration of
criminal justice;

(8) Coordinate activities relating to the administration
of criminal justice among agencies of state and local government;

(9) Cooperate with the federal and other state authorities
concerning the administration of criminal justice;

(10) Accept and administer loans, grants, and donations from
the United States, its agencies, the State of Nebraska, its agencies, and
other sources, public and private, for carrying out any of its functions,
except that no communications equipment shall be acquired and no approval
for acquisition of communications equipment shall be granted without receiving
the written approval of the Director of Communications of the office of Chief
Information Officer;

(11) Enter into contracts, leases, and agreements necessary,
convenient, or desirable for carrying out its purposes and the powers granted
under sections 81-1415 to 81-1426 with agencies of state or local government,
corporations, or persons;

(12) Acquire, hold, and dispose of personal property in the
exercise of its powers;

(13) Conduct random annual audits of criminal justice agencies
to verify the accuracy and completeness of criminal history record information
maintained by such agencies and to determine compliance with laws and regulations
dealing with the dissemination, security, and privacy of criminal history
information;

(14) Do all things necessary to carry out its purposes and
for the exercise of the powers granted in sections 81-1415 to 81-1426, except
that no activities or transfers or expenditures of funds available to the
commission shall be inconsistent with legislative policy as reflected in substantive
legislation, legislative intent legislation, or appropriations legislation;

(15) Exercise budgetary and administrative control over the
Crime Victim's Reparations Committee and the Jail Standards Board; and

(16) Do
all things necessary to carry out sections 81-1843 to 81-1851.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 9, p. 2934;

Laws 1971, LB 225, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 20;

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 27;

Laws 1979, LB 412, § 11;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 57;

Laws 1981, LB 477, § 7;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 36;

Laws 1981, LB 328, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 15;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 16;

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 21;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 18.

Crime victim's reparations, see Chapter 81, article 18.

Jail Standards Board, see sections 83-4,124 to 83-4,134.